Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.200

Bylaws of association—Election of directors by representatives or advisers from districts of territory.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts, and that the directors shall be elected by representatives or advisers, who themselves have been elected by the members from the several territorial districts. In such case, the bylaws shall specify the number of representatives or advisers to be elected by each district, the manner and method of reapportioning the representatives or advisers and of redistricting the territory covered by the association.

[ 1959 c 312 s 20.]